Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. Psychiatric and Behavioral Evaluations and Treatments.

Sec. 14.30.171.
Prohibited actions.

Except as provided in AS

14.30.172

—

14.30.176

, school personnel may not, unless otherwise authorized by law or a specific policy adopted by a governing body of a school district,

recommend to a parent or guardian that a child take or continue to take a psychotropic drug as a condition for attending a public school;

require that a child take or continue to take a psychotropic drug as a condition for attending a public school, except when, in the opinion of the child’s treating physician,

the medication is necessary for the mental health of the child; or

the child poses a risk of harm to self or others without the medication;

conduct a psychiatric evaluation of a child;

recommend a specific licensed physician, psychologist, or other health specialist to a parent or guardian for a child; or

recommend that a parent or guardian seek or use for a child

a psychotropic medication; or

a psychiatric or psychological treatment.

As used in this section, “school personnel” means persons employed by a public school or school district to work in a public school, except for a person who holds a special services type C certificate issued under AS 14.20 that qualifies the person to be employed to provide related services to students, as described in regulations adopted by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Sec. 14.30.172.
Communication not prohibited.

Nothing in AS

14.30.171

may be construed to prohibit school personnel from

consulting or sharing classroom-based observations with parents or guardians regarding a student’s academic and functional performance, behavior in the classroom or school, or the need for evaluation for special education or related services as long as school personnel do not make an assertion or recommendation that violates AS

14.30.171

; or

exercising their authority relating to the placement within the school or readmission of a child who may be or has been suspended or expelled for a violation of a school disciplinary and safety program adopted under AS

14.03.160

, AS

14.30.045

, or AS

14.33.110

—

14.33.140

.

Nothing in AS

14.30.171

may be construed to prevent teachers or other school personnel from complying with the requirements of AS

47.17.020(a)

or (b) or from filing a report to authorities if a child poses a serious and imminent risk to the child’s or another person’s safety.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.30.174.
Compliance with federal education law.

Notwithstanding AS

14.30.171(a)(3)

and (5), a behavioral or mental health professional working within a public school system may, in compliance with federal education law or applicable state law,

recommend, but not require, a psychiatric or behavioral health evaluation of a child; and

recommend, but not require, psychiatric, psychological, or behavioral treatment for a child.

In this section,

“behavioral health professional” means a person who has a master’s degree in psychology, social work, counseling, or a related field with specialization or experience in working with children experiencing behavioral, physical, and emotional disabilities, and is working within the scope of the person’s training and experience;

“federal education law” means 20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482 (Individuals with Disabilities Education Act), 20 U.S.C. 7101 — 7143 (Safe and Drug-Free Schools and Communities Act of 1994), 29 U.S.C. 794 (nondiscrimination under federal grants and programs), and 42 U.S.C. 12101 — 12213 (equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities);

“mental health professional” has the meaning given in AS

47.30.915

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 2006; am § 19 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1482” for “20 U.S.C. 1400 — 1487” in paragraph (b)(2).

Sec. 14.30.176.
List of community resources.

Notwithstanding AS

14.30.171(a)(4)

, a school district may make available to an interested parent or guardian a list of community resources, including mental health services if the list conspicuously states the following: “This list is provided as a resource to you. The school neither recommends nor requires that you use this list or any of the services provided by individuals or entities on the list. It is for you to decide what services, if any, to use and from whom you wish to obtain them.”

A list provided under (a) of this section must include the name, specialty, and credential of each mental health service provider listed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.30.177.
Violations.

Each school board shall adopt a policy that provides that an employee violating AS

14.30.171

—

14.30.176

may be subject to disciplinary action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.30.179.
Definition.

In AS

14.30.171

—

14.30.179

, “public school” means a school operated by publicly elected or appointed school officials in which the program and activities are under the control of those officials and that is supported by public funds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 76 SLA 2006)